Illinois, session 104th, HB4521.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education to award funding 7under the Education of Homeless Children and Youth State Grant 8Program to be used to support programming for students at risk 9for or experiencing homelessness in compliance with Public Act 10103-744. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122026.